en: Corn dogs
xx: Corn dogs

en: Onigiri
xx: Onigiri
de: Onigiri
es: Onigiri
fr: Onigiri
hr: Onigiri
it: Onigiri
ja: おにぎり, おむすび, 握り飯
nl: Onigiri
pl: Onigiri

en: Panzerotti
xx: Panzerotti
de: Panzerotti
es: Panzerotti
fr: Panzerotti
hr: Panzerotti
it: Panzerotti

en: Cheese croquettes
bg: Крокети със сирене
fr: Croquettes au fromage
hr: Kroketi od sira
lt: Sūrio kroketai
nl: Kaaskroketten

fr: Croquettes aux crevettes
bg: Крокети със скариди
nl: Garnalenkroketten

en: Cassava crisps
de: Maniok Chips, Cassava Chips
fr: Chips de manioc
hr: Čips od kasave
lt: Kasavos traškučiai
nl: Cassave kroepoek, Maniokchips, Kroepoek
pl: Chipsy z manioku, Czipsy z manioku

en: Prawn crackers, Prawn cocktail crisps
de: Krabbenchips, Krupuk, Garnelencocktail Chips
fr: Chips de manioc à la crevette, chips de manioc aux crevettes, chips à la crevette au manioc, chips aux crevettes au manioc, chips au manioc à la crevette, chips au manioc aux crevettes, Chips cocktail de crevettes, Chips de crevette
hr: Krekeri od kozica, Koktel čips od kozica
lt: Krevečių kokteilių traškučiai, krevečių krekeriai
nl: Garnalenkroepoek, Garnalenchips

en: Parsnip Crisps
de: Pastinaken Chips
fr: Chips de panais
hr: Čips od pastrnjaka
lt: Pasternoko traškučiai
nl: Pastinaakchips

en: Sweet potato crisps
de: Süßkartoffelchips
fi: Bataattilastut
fr: Chips de patate douce
hr: Čips od batata
ja: さつまいもチップス
lt: Saldžiųjų bulvių traškučiai
nl: Zoete aardappelchips

en: Quinoa crisps
de: Quinoa Chips
fr: Chips au quinoa
hr: Čips od kvinoje
nl: Quinoa chips

en: Banana crisps
de: Bananenchips
es: Rodajas de plátano deshidratadas, Chips de plátano
fr: Chips de banane
it: Chips di banana essiccata
lt: Džiovinti bananų traškučiai
nl: Banana chips

en: Lentil crisps
fr: Chips de lentilles
nl: Linzenchips

en: Potato crisps, potato chips
bg: Картофен чипс
ca: Xips de patata
da: Kartoffelchips
de: Kartoffelchips
es: Chips de patatas fritas
fi: perunalastut
fr: Chips de pommes de terre
hr: Čips od krumpira
hu: Burgonyás csipsz
it: Patatine
ja: ポテトチップス
lt: Bulvių traškučiai
nl: Aardappelchips
pl: Chipsy ziemniaczane, Czipsy ziemniaczane
pt: Batatas fritas
ro: Chipsuri de cartofi
ru: Картофельные чипсы
sv: Potatischips
zh: 马铃薯薯片

en: Old-fashioned style potato crisps, Potato crisps à l'ancienne, Old-fashioned crisps
de: Klassische Chips
fi: Vanhanaikaiset perunalastut
fr: Chips de pommes de terre à l'ancienne, Chips à l'ancienne
hr: Čips od krumpira à l'ancienne, Starinski čips
it: Patatine all'antica
lt: Senamadiški bulvių traškučiai, Senoviniai traškučiai
nl: Traditionele chips

fr: Chips de pommes de terre lisses
es: Chips de patatas fritas lisas

en: Wavy potato crisps, Wavy potato chips
da: Bølgekartoffelchips, Kartoffelbølgechips
es: Chips de patatas fritas onduladas
fr: Chips de pommes de terre ondulées
hr: Valoviti čips od krumpira
lt: Banguoti bulvių traškučiai
nl: Ribbelchips
sv: Räfflade potatischips

en: Light potato crisps, Potato crisps with reduced fat
de: Leichte Kartoffelchips
fi: Kevytperunalastut, Perunalastut vähennetyllä rasvalla
fr: Chips de pommes de terre allégées, Chips de pommes de terre allégées en matière grasse
hr: Svijetli čips od krumpira
lt: Bulvių traškučiai su sumažintu riebalų kiekiu, Lengvi bulvių traškučiai
nl: Light aardappelchips

en: Potato crisps with salt
da: Saltede kartoffelchips, Kartoffelchips med salt
fr: Chips de pommes de terre salés
nl: Aardappelchips met zout
sv: Saltade potatischips

en: Potato crisps with sea salt
da: Kartoffelchips med havsalt
fr: Chips de pomme de terre au sel de mer
nl: Aardappelchips met zeezout
sv: Potatischips med havssalt

en: Potato crisps in sunflower oil
bg: Картофен чипс със слънчогледово олио
ca: Xips de patata amb oli de gira-sol
da: Kartoffelchips med solsikkeolie
de: Kartoffelchips mit Sonnenblumenöl
es: Chips de patatas fritas en aceite de girasol
fi: Perunalastut auringonkukkaöljyllä
fr: Chips de pommes de terre à l’huile de tournesol
hr: Čips od krumpira u suncokretovom ulju
it: Patatine in olio di semi di girasole
lt: Bulvių traškučiai saulėgrąžų aliejuje
nl: Aardappelchips gebakken in zonnebloemolie
pt: Batatas fritas em óleo de girassol
ru: Картофельные чипсы на подсолнечном масле
sv: Potatischips med solrosolja